Wisconsin, session 2025, AB961.
do enact as follows:AB961,11Section 1. 20.455 (2) (gq) of the statutes is created to read:AB961,2,5220.455 (2) (gq) Enforcement of explicit content warning label violations; 3explicit content warning label surcharge. All moneys received from the explicit 4content warning label surcharge under s. 100.77 (3) (e) for investigation and 5enforcement of violations under s. 100.77 (2).AB961,26Section 2. 100.77 of the statutes is created to read:AB961,3,21100.77 Warning labels for explicit content. (1) Definitions. In this 2section:AB961,3,43(b) “Digital platform” means a website, application, or electronic service that 4allows users to access, purchase, or view explicit content.AB961,3,65(a) “Distributor” means a person that provides, sells, or publishes explicit 6content for profit or as part of a commercial service.AB961,3,87(c) “Explicit content” means visual, written, or auditory material that is all of 8the following:AB961,3,991. Intended for an adult audience.AB961,3,10102. Lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value.AB961,3,11113. Depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive way.AB961,3,1312(d) “Print publication” means any physical publication, including books, 13magazines, and pamphlets, that contains explicit content.AB961,3,1514(2) Warning label required. All distributors must provide a prominent, 15clear, and conspicuous warning label on explicit content as follows:AB961,3,1716(a) For explicit content the distributor provides, sells, or publishes in a print 17publication, the warning label is all of the following:AB961,3,19181. Displayed on the front cover or the first page or, if the print publication is 19encased in packaging or film, clearly and visibly fixed upon the packaging or film.AB961,3,20202. In bolded text and Arial font of a minimum size of 20 points.AB961,3,21213. Includes language that is substantially similar to the following:AB961,3,2322“WARNING: This material contains explicit content that may be harmful or 23offensive. Viewer discretion is advised. Not intended for minors.”AB961,4,21(b) For explicit content the distributor provides, sells, or publishes on a digital 2platform, the warning label is all of the following:AB961,4,331. It appears to the user before the user accesses the explicit content.AB961,4,642. It remains visible to the user for at least 10 seconds or until the user 5actively acknowledges the warning label through interaction with the digital 6platform.AB961,4,873. It uses bolded text that is in high-contrast with its immediate background 8and that is in roughly equal size to other displayed text.AB961,4,1094. It occupies at least two-thirds of the user’s screen, regardless of the type of 10device, program, or browser used to access the explicit content.AB961,4,11115. It includes language that is substantially similar to the following:AB961,4,1312“WARNING: This material contains explicit content that may be harmful or 13offensive. Viewer discretion is advised. Not intended for minors.”AB961,4,1614(c) A distributor shall ensure that each piece of explicit content it provides, 15sells, or publishes on a digital platform contains the text 16“WisconsinExplicitContentWarning” in the explicit content’s metadata.AB961,4,2017(3) Notice, enforcement, and penalties. (a) The department of justice 18shall enforce this section and investigate alleged violations of sub. (2). Subject to 19par. (b), the department of justice may bring an action for temporary or permanent 20injunctive relief or the penalties authorized in pars. (c) and (d).AB961,4,2321(b) At least 14 days before the day on which an action is initiated under par. 22(a), the department of justice shall provide the distributor with written notice that 23identifies each alleged violation of sub. (2).AB961,5,21(c) 1. For an initial violation, a distributor that violates sub. (2) is subject to a 2forfeiture not to exceed $2,500 for each violation.AB961,5,532. Notwithstanding subd. 1., for an initial violation, if a distributor cures a 4violation of sub. (2) within 14 days of receiving a written notice under par. (b), the 5distributor shall be subject to a forfeiture not to exceed $500 per cured violation.AB961,5,863. For purposes of this paragraph, an initial violation includes all violations 7that are the subject of the same enforcement proceeding if no enforcement 8proceeding has previously been brought against the distributor.AB961,5,139(d) For a 2nd or subsequent violation, a distributor that violates sub. (2) is 10subject to a forfeiture for each violation of twice the amount of the forfeiture 11imposed on the distributor for the most recent prior violation. For purposes of this 12paragraph, the reduction in forfeiture under par. (c) 2. shall be disregarded and the 13forfeiture for a 2nd violation shall not exceed $5,000 for each violation.AB961,5,1714(e) 1. If a court imposes a forfeiture under par. (c) or (d), the court shall also 15impose an explicit content warning label surcharge under ch. 814 equal to 50 16percent of the amount of the forfeiture. If a forfeiture is suspended in whole or in 17part, the surcharge shall be reduced in proportion to the suspension.AB961,5,23182. The clerk of the circuit court shall collect and transmit to the county 19treasurer the surcharge under subd. 1. as required under s. 59.40 (2) (m). The 20county treasurer shall then pay the secretary of administration as provided in s. 2159.25 (3) (f) 2. The secretary of administration shall deposit all amounts received 22under this subdivision in the general fund and shall credit them to the 23appropriation account under s. 20.455 (2) (gq).AB961,6,324(4) Private cause of action. (a) The department of justice shall create a 1notice form to be used by individuals and organizations to inform distributors of the 2distributor’s alleged violation of sub. (2). This paragraph does not grant to the 3department of justice any rule-making authority.AB961,6,54(b) 1. The notice form under par. (a) shall include areas for the person 5completing the form to provide all of the following information:AB961,6,66a. The name and contact information of the person completing the form.AB961,6,87b. The name and contact information, to the extent known, of the distributor 8alleged to be in violation of sub. (2).AB961,6,99b. The date of each alleged violation of sub. (2).AB961,6,1010c. A description of each alleged violation of sub. (2).AB961,6,1211d. Attachments of any photographs or other documentation depicting each 12alleged violation of sub. (2).AB961,6,1513e. The person’s signature, the date the notice form is completed, and a 14certification that the information provided by the person is true and accurate to the 15best of the person’s knowledge and belief.AB961,6,16162. The notice form under par. (a) shall also include all of the following:AB961,6,2117a. The statement: “You are receiving this form because the person completing 18the form has alleged that you are in violation of section 100.77 of the Wisconsin 19Statutes. This form is also being submitted to the Wisconsin Department of 20Justice. The Department of Justice or the person completing this form may initiate 21legal proceedings against you for violations described in this notice.” Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab961 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab961 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB961 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB961 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB961: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting